District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Project Homecoming Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Office on Ex-Offender Affairs and the Commission on Re-Entry and Ex-
Offender Affairs Establishment Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Official Code § 24-
1302), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 is amended by adding new paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) to read as
follows:
(1) “Program participant” means a returning citizen participating in the Returning
Citizens Family and Community Reunification Support Program.
(2) "Program" means the Returning Citizens Family and Community Reunification

Support Program established by this act.
(3) "Eligible household" means an individual who meets the eligibility requirements
established in section 3a(c) of this act.
(4) “Eligible program participant” means a returning citizen who meets the eligibility
requirements established in section 3a(d) of this act.
(5) "Rental Agreement" means a structured, time-limited agreement between an Eligible
Household and a Program participant, facilitated through the Program, that sets expectations for
housing arrangements, financial assistance, and support services.
(b) A new section 3a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. “(a) The Office shall establish a Returning Citizens Family and Community
Reunification and Support Program ("Program") to assist eligible households with housing and
support returning citizens who are recently returned in finding high quality, supportive living
arrangements.
“(b)(1) The Program shall:
“(A) Support returning citizens who are recently returned in finding high quality, supportive
living arrangements;
“(B) Provide direct financial assistance to eligible households to subsidize
housing and support costs associated with housing returning citizens;
“(C) Train eligible households on typical challenges facing returning citizens,
available support resources across the District, and program expectations of eligible households;
“(D) Connect program participants to wraparound services, including counseling,
employment support, and access to mental health services; and
“(E) Monitor and evaluate households and individuals participating in the
program quarterly for compliance to program requirements and to understand outcomes.

(2) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Office may use up to 5% of funds allocated for this
Program for administrative costs associated with implementation.
“(c) For a household to be eligible, the individual representing the household shall:
“(1) Reside in the District of Columbia;
“(2) Have a lease or deed with their name on it at the location where they reside;
“(3) Successfully complete a program screening and approval process;
(4) Participate in mandatory training as described in subsection (e)(3) of this act;
“(5) Provide a single, enclosed, non-shared space of at least 70 square feet at the
address listed in the lease or deed where they reside to an eligible program participant for at least
6 months;
“(6) Demonstrate financial need for support to maintain stable living
arrangements;
“(7) Sign a housing agreement, meeting the requirements of subsection (e) of
this section, with an eligible program participant; and
(8) Agree to participate in Program evaluations, including periodic check-ins, and
service utilization reviews.
“(d) To be eligible, a program participant must:
(1) Have been incarcerated for at least 365 days consecutively, with a release date
within the past 24 months;
(2) Remain compliant with applicable parole agreements, maintain contact with
parole agent, including confirmation of new address and all other conditions
of parole; and
(3) Sign a housing agreement, meeting the requirements of subsection (e) of this
section, with an eligible household.

“(e) The Office shall:
“(1) Establish and facilitate housing agreements between Program Participants
and Participating Households that:
“(A) Establishes clear expectations, rights, and responsibilities for
Program Participants and Participating Households;
“(B) Outlines mutual expectations regarding housing conditions and
financial assistance;
“(C) Includes a dispute resolution mechanism to address conflicts between
Program Participants and Participating Households;
“(D) Establishes a right for the Participating Household to immediately
terminate the lease agreement and for the Program Participant to vacate the property if the
Program Participant brings a weapon or drug onto the property or commits a physical assault on
the property; and
“(E) Establishes a right for the Participating Household to provide 30 days
notice to terminate the lease agreement and for the Program Participant to vacate the property for
100 any reason;
101 “(2) Administer the program, including ensuring program compliance, supporting
102 participant success, and evaluating outcomes;
103 “(3) Partner with community-based reentry service providers to provide training
104 for Participating Households, which shall be completed prior to approval of an
105 application and shall include:
106 “(A) Understanding reentry challenges, including employment barriers,
107 legal restrictions, and stigmas faced;
108 “(B) Trauma-informed support, including strategies for assisting

109 individuals transitioning from incarceration;
110 “(C) Conflict resolution to foster positive household dynamics;
111 “(D) Housing stability best practices and setting household expectations;
112 and
113 “(E) Available community resources, including mental health and
114 employment services for returning citizens;
115 “(3) Maintain a database of approved eligible households willing to participate in
116 the program and match those households with eligible participants;
117 “(4) Establish an application process for eligible program participants and eligible
118 households and issue a request for applications for this Program no later than January 31,
119 2026, and no later than January 31 annually thereafter;
120 “(5) Allocate funds to Participating Households in the form of monthly stipends
121 $1,500 per month per Program Participant and notify approved applicants no later than October
122 31, 2026;
123 “(6) Partner with community-based organizations and other District agencies,
124 including the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Department of
125 Employment Services, The Department of Human Services, and the Department of Behavioral
126 Health, to provide reentry services and case management to program participants; and
127 “(7) Conduct annual reviews to assess the Program’s impact on recidivism,
128 employment, and housing stability among returning citizens and submit an annual report to the
129 Council detailing Program operations, outcomes, and recommendations for improvement.
130 “(f) The Commission on Reentry and Returning Citizen Affairs, as established by section
131 4a of this act, shall oversee the implementation of this Program and ensure compliance with its
132 provisions.

133 “(1) The Commission shall:
134 “(A) Monitor program outcomes, including housing stability, employment rates,
135 and recidivism reduction among Program Participants;
136 “(B) Provide policy recommendations to the Mayor and the Council regarding
137 improvements to the Program;
138 “(C) Conduct an annual review of financial expenditures, participation rates, and
139 service utilization to assess the Program’s effectiveness;
140 “(D) Hold quarterly public meetings to solicit feedback from Program
141 Participants, Participating Households, and community stakeholders; and
142 “(E) Submit an annual report to the Director and the Council detailing the
143 Program’s impact, challenges, and recommendations for expansion or modification.
144 “(2) MORCA shall provide all necessary data, reports, and administrative support to the
145 Commission to facilitate oversight and ensure transparency.”
146 Sec. 3. Rules.
147 The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
148 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.) shall issue rules
149 to implement the provisions of this act.
150 Sec.4. Fiscal impact statement
151 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
152 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
153 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
154 Sec. 5. Effective date.
155 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
156 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as

157 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
158 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
159 Columbia Register.